Georgia statutes. 
Filing of suit after expiration of 30-day claim period. - While this statute only prevents suit being filed within the period of 30 days after the filing of the claim with the city authorities, the statute does not prevent the filing of the suit at any time after the expiration of the 30 days, irrespective of whether or not the city authorities have acted on the claim. City of Atlanta v. Truitt, 55 Ga. App. 365, 190 S.E. 369 (1937).

When period begins to run. - Time within which the notice must be given in order to comply with the statute begins to run on the day the breach of the city's duty occurred. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969).

Suit may not be filed until 30 days from filing of claim. - This section clearly prevents the filing of a suit against the municipality until after the expiration of 30 days from the filing of the claim in writing with the municipal authorities as required. Of course, this claim must be filed within the period of the statute of limitations, and before the plaintiffs' right of action is barred. City of Atlanta v. Truitt, 55 Ga. App. 365, 190 S.E. 369 (1937).

O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 contemplates that suit shall not be brought until after the municipal authorities have acted upon the claim, or have failed to take action thereon within 30 days. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Effect of only part of injury occurring within statutory period. - While the ante litem notice required to be given by this section is a prerequisite to the maintenance of an action against a city, if it appears from the notice that a part of the injury from which the claim arises occurred within the six-month period immediately preceding the notice, a general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) will not lie for noncompliance with this statute. City of Gainesville v. Moss, 108 Ga. App. 713, 134 S.E.2d 547 (1963), overruled on other grounds, City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).

Municipality may answer claim after period elapsed. - Length of time in which to consider and act upon a claim against a municipal corporation under this section has reference to consideration and action by public officers as affecting the public interest. It is not declared that the governing authority may not consider and act upon the claim after 30 days have elapsed. It could be to the public interest to have longer than 30 days. The object is to facilitate adjustment without suit, and there is no express withdrawal of power to consider and act. Thus, the quoted part of the first proviso of this section is merely directory, and not a limitation of authority. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Effect of disability. - When the person to whom the claim belongs under former Code 1933, § 69-308 (see now O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5) is a person under disability as set forth in O.C.G.A. §§ 9-3-90 and 9-3-98, the limitation period does not begin to run until such time as the disability shall have been removed. City of Barnesville v. Powell, 124 Ga. App. 132, 183 S.E.2d 55 (1971); Barnum v. Martin, 135 Ga. App. 712, 219 S.E.2d 341 (1975); Lowe v. Pue, 150 Ga. App. 234, 257 S.E.2d 209 (1979); City of Fairburn v. Cook, 188 Ga. App. 58, 372 S.E.2d 245, cert. denied, 188 Ga. App. 911, 372 S.E.2d 245 (1988); Jacobs v. Littleton, 241 Ga. App. 403, 525 S.E.2d 433 (1999).

Mental and physical incapacitation tolls statute. - When a person has a cause of action for personal injuries against a municipal corporation for which, as a condition precedent to its enforcement, the person is required to give the statutory notice provided for in this section, and where, as a result of the occurrence giving rise to the cause of action, such person becomes mentally and physically incapacitated so as to be incapable of acting individually in carrying on the person's business and in prosecuting the person's claim, the time limit for giving the statutory notice of the person's claim is tolled until such time as the person regains the capacity to act individually or until such time as a guardian is appointed and actually does act for the person, or until such time as one bona fide acting for the person as next friend actually gives the defendant municipality such notice. When a suit is brought thereafter by such next friend during the continuing disability of the plaintiff showing a notice given to the defendant more than 30 days prior to the filing thereof it is not subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss) on the ground that such notice was not timely given. City of Atlanta v. Barrett, 102 Ga. App. 469, 116 S.E.2d 654 (1960).

Plaintiff waiting past expiration of 30-day period protected. - When a plaintiff, though having the right to sue immediately after the expiration of the 30-day period, nevertheless waits longer pending action on the demand by the municipal authorities, the plaintiff does so by permission of the law as well as under guaranty of the law that so long as the claim was pending without action the statute would not run against the plaintiff. It necessarily follows that this case is not to be governed by the general rule as to computing the limitation period from the time the cause of action accrues, but that it is governed by the exception found in the second proviso to this section, so far as it relates to the statute of limitations. City of Rome v. Rigdon, 192 Ga. 742, 16 S.E.2d 902 (1941).

Effect of later discovery of additional injury. - Later discovery by plaintiff that plaintiff was suffering from additional injury from plaintiff's previous fall does not toll or extend the time for giving the requisite ante litem notice. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969).

Effect of period ending on Sunday. - If the statutory six-months period for the giving of the notice ends on a Sunday, it does not extend the time to the Monday following since the period is measured in months, not days. Schaefer v. Mayor of Athens, 120 Ga. App. 301, 170 S.E.2d 339 (1969).

When the plaintiff failed to give notice to a municipality within six months of the claim's origin, the court did not err in dismissing the complaint. Perdue v. City Council, 137 Ga. App. 702, 225 S.E.2d 62 (1976); Anderson v. City of Glenwood, 893 F. Supp. 1086 (S.D. Ga. 1995).

Tolling of claims against municipal corporations. - In a tort action brought by a passenger against a regional transportation authority, the reversal of the denial of the authority's motion for judgment on the pleadings was upheld because by its terms, O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(d) permitted the tolling of the period of limitation only for claims against municipal corporations and it was not a municipal corporation. Foster v. Ga. Reg'l Transp. Auth., 297 Ga. 714, 777 S.E.2d 446 (2015).

Case of continuing nuisance. - Notice to a city alleged to have been given within six months from the expiration of the four-year statute of limitations period during which the nuisance sued on continuously caused damage to the petitioner's property was given within the time prescribed by this section. Vickers v. City of Fitzgerald, 216 Ga. 476, 117 S.E.2d 316 (1960), overruled on other grounds, City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).

Upon giving the six-month notice required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, a property owner who incurs damage as a result of a continuing nuisance or trespass maintained by a municipality is entitled within the four-year period of limitations, to recover only those damages incurred during the six-months preceding the giving of such notice. The recovery of any damages incurred prior thereto would be barred, since no timely notice of claim therefor was given pursuant to this section; overruling Vickers v. City of Fitzgerald, 216 Ga. 476, 117 S.E.2d 316 (1960); City of Gainesville v. Moss, 108 Ga. App. 713(2), 134 S.E.2d 547 (1963). City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).

When a property owner failed to give any written notice to a city prior to filing a complaint for continuing trespass, summary judgment in favor of the city was proper as to the owner's claim for damages resulting from any continuing trespass "event" which occurred more than six months prior to the filing of the complaint. Any claim for damages resulting from a continuing trespass "event" which occurred within six months of the filing of the complaint was subject to a plea in abatement, rather than a motion seeking substantive adjudication. City of Chamblee v. Maxwell, 264 Ga. 635, 452 S.E.2d 488 (1994).

Trial court properly granted summary judgment to the city on the claimant's tort claims arising from the back up of a sewer that flooded the claimant's home as no genuine dispute existed that the claimant did not file a written ante litem notice with the city within six months of the happening of the event that gave rise to the claim, the first flooding. The claimant was required to file written notice within that time even though the claimant alleged the flooding was a continuing nuisance as the city was entitled to notice arising from the first flooding so the city could attempt to fix the problem and the claimant's failure to timely give the city written notice meant the city could not be held liable. Cundy v. City of Smyrna, 264 Ga. App. 535, 591 S.E.2d 447 (2003).

Trial court properly determined that the property owners' claims of property damage, based on a continuing nuisance due to sewage backup, that occurred more than six months prior to the filing of their ante litem notice pursuant to O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5(b) were barred as untimely; although a prior letter could have constituted an ante litem notice, the four-year limitations period under O.C.G.A. § 9-3-30 had run prior to the institution of the lawsuit such that any claims in the six months prior to that letter were also barred. Davis v. City of Forsyth, 275 Ga. App. 747, 621 S.E.2d 495 (2005).

Disability of infancy is only removed when party affected reaches that party's lawful majority. Barnum v. Martin, 135 Ga. App. 712, 219 S.E.2d 341 (1975).

Statute will not run against minor represented in litigation by next friend or guardian ad litem. Barnum v. Martin, 135 Ga. App. 712, 219 S.E.2d 341 (1975).

Appointment of a guardian does not operate to start the statute of limitations running against the minor or the guardian in cases when the title to the cause of action is in the minor. Barnum v. Martin, 135 Ga. App. 712, 219 S.E.2d 341 (1975).

Notice to city employees not required. - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 requires notice only if the claim is against the municipality; the statute does not require ante litem notice to individual employees of a municipality. Jacobs v. Littleton, 241 Ga. App. 403, 525 S.E.2d 433 (1999).

Procedure

Necessity of alleging timely notice. - An action for damages for personal injuries against a municipality which fails to allege that the plaintiff's claim has been presented in writing to the municipality within six months of the occurrence of the injury is subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Jones v. City Council, 100 Ga. App. 268, 110 S.E.2d 691 (1959).

That part of the holding in Dover v. City of Jackson, 246 Ga. App. 524 (2000), requiring an ante litem notice for a statutory claim for attorney fees and costs of litigation is overruled because it is contrary to the specific statutory language, which limits its applicability to claims brought "on account of injuries to person or property"; the holding also ignores the courts' duty to strictly construe the statute because it is in derogation of common law. Greater Atlanta Home Builders Ass'n, Inc. v. City of McDonough, 322 Ga. App. 627, 745 S.E.2d 830 (2013).

Substantial compliance must be alleged. - In a claim for money damages against a municipal corporation on account of injuries to person or property, the petition must affirmatively allege a compliance with the provisions of this section and unless it does so, it should be dismissed on demurrer (now motion to dismiss). Saunders v. City of Fitzgerald, 113 Ga. 619, 38 S.E. 978 (1901); Hooper v. City of Atlanta, 26 Ga. App. 221, 105 S.E. 723 (1921); Grooms v. City of Hawkinsville, 31 Ga. App. 424, 120 S.E. 807 (1923); Newton v. City of Moultrie, 37 Ga. App. 631, 141 S.E. 322 (1928).

While giving of notice is a condition precedent to bringing an action, the giving of such notice is at once part and parcel of the enforcement of the right and it is an inseparable part of the bringing of the action. It is a part of the procedure for enforcing the right and as such it must affirmatively appear in the petition, either in the body thereof or by an exhibit thereto that such notice has been given. A petition which does not thus affirmatively show performance of the condition precedent is subject to general demurrer (now motion to dismiss). City of Atlanta v. Barrett, 102 Ga. App. 469, 116 S.E.2d 654 (1960); Bituminous Cas. Corp. v. R.D.C., Inc., 334 F. Supp. 1163 (N.D. Ga. 1971).

Compliance with this section must be alleged in the complaint or else the complaint cannot state a cause of action. City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969).

Allegations of compliance are not subject to demurrer (now motion to dismiss) merely because no copy of a claim was attached to the petition. Habersham County v. Cornwall, 38 Ga. App. 419, 144 S.E. 55 (1928).

When no allegation in complaint that notice given to city, claim not maintainable. - O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 requires written notice of the charges to the municipal corporation. When a complaint does not make any allegation that written notice was given to a city, no claim based on state law can be maintained against the city. Dague v. Riverdale Athletic Ass'n, 99 F.R.D. 325 (N.D. Ga. 1983).

Effect of allegation of notice in renewal petition. - An allegation in the renewal petition to the effect that prior to the institution of the former suit, which was against a municipal corporation, the plaintiff had served upon the defendant a written notice of claim, as provided by this section, in which the plaintiff claimed damages arising out of the same cause of action as that sued on in the renewal petition, is not an allegation as to the cause of action sued on in the former suit. Barber v. City of Rome, 39 Ga. App. 225, 146 S.E. 856 (1929).

Giving of notice is part of trial process. City of Atlanta v. Frank, 120 Ga. App. 273, 170 S.E.2d 265 (1969).

Stipulation as to receiving notice. - In a nuisance suit by homeowners against the City of Atlanta with regard to recurrent flooding in a neighborhood, the trial court erred in granting the city's motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict as to one homeowner based on the homeowners' alleged failure to put forth any evidence that those homeowners served the city with the statutorily required ante litem notice; because the record demonstrated that the city stipulated that one of the homeowners had provided ante litem notice, the trial court erred in granting a judgment notwithstanding the verdict as to that homeowner, but since there was no citation in the record as to the other homeowner providing ante litem notice to the city, granting of the city's motion for judgment notwithstanding the verdict as to that homeowner was proper. City of Atlanta v. Broadnax, 285 Ga. App. 430, 646 S.E.2d 279 (2007), cert. denied, No. S07C1445, 2007 Ga. LEXIS 615, 648 (Ga. 2007), overruled on other grounds, Royal Capital Dev. LLC v. Md. Cas. Co., 291 Ga. 262, 728 S.E.2d 234 (2012).

Failure to rebut allegation of notice in amended complaint. - When plaintiff, in plaintiff's amended complaint, alleged plaintiff gave the ante litem notice required by O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, but the defendants failed to rebut the allegation in the amended complaint, the dismissal of the complaint under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 was improper. Harper v. Savannah Police Dep't, 179 Ga. App. 449, 346 S.E.2d 891 (1986).

Municipality required to consider claim. - After plaintiffs furnish a sufficient ante litem notice, the municipality is required to consider and act on the claim by settlement or denial. City of Claxton v. Claxton Poultry Co., 134 Ga. App. 679, 215 S.E.2d 718 (1975).

Evasive answer treated as admission. - Petition alleged that notice of claim for damages was given to the defendant municipal corporation. The defendant being chargeable with knowledge of the service upon it of this notice, and its answer to this allegation of the petition being evasive, the answer will be treated as an admission that the notice was given as alleged. Mayor of Madison v. Bearden, 22 Ga. App. 376, 96 S.E. 572, cert. denied, 22 Ga. App. 803 (1918).

Availability of discovery. - Further discovery procedures are available to the city on the same basis offered by law to parties in all litigation proceedings. City of Claxton v. Claxton Poultry Co., 134 Ga. App. 679, 215 S.E.2d 718 (1975).

Municipality may not demand additional information or hearing. - There is no requirement contemplated by the statute that after receipt of a notice of claim the municipality may require additional information, or that the city may demand that the complainant appear before the city's council for an informational hearing. City of Claxton v. Claxton Poultry Co., 134 Ga. App. 679, 215 S.E.2d 718 (1975).

Compliance with section must be proven. - When, in an action for personal injuries against a city, compliance with this section is alleged, and such allegation is denied by the city, it is a necessary part of the plaintiff's case that plaintiff prove compliance with the statute, and on failure to show substantial compliance therewith it is not error to grant a nonsuit. City of Tallapoosa v. Brock, 138 Ga. 622, 75 S.E. 644 (1912); Bostwick v. City of Griffin, 141 Ga. 120, 80 S.E. 657 (1913).

When the trial record did not clearly establish that six-months' ante litem notice was not given, it was error to dismiss the claim against the municipal corporation. Brackett v. City of Atlanta, 149 Ga. App. 147, 253 S.E.2d 786 (1979).

Plaintiff bound by acts alleged in notice. - Petition on which the plaintiff seeks recovery against the city must be based on the claimed negligent transaction as set out in the notice given to the city, and plaintiff cannot proceed against the city upon acts of negligence different from those set out in that notice. City of Atlanta v. Harris, 52 Ga. App. 56, 182 S.E. 202 (1935).

Plaintiff's action for malicious prosecution was premature, as was plaintiff's ante litem notice to the defendant municipality, when plaintiff's indictment for theft of services had been dead-docketed, since termination of that prosecution in plaintiff's favor was a prerequisite to bringing of a malicious prosecution suit and dead-docketing of a case does not terminate a malicious prosecution case. Webster v. City of E. Point, 164 Ga. App. 605, 294 S.E.2d 588 (1982).

Premature suit grounds for abatement, not summary judgment. - Compliance with O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 is a condition precedent to filing suit against the city, but the filing of suit against the city prior to the expiration of 30 days from the time of filing the claim is a matter that is properly raised as a plea in abatement and not a proper subject for summary judgment. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Dismissal, rather than summary judgment, is appropriate in cases when the merits cannot be reached because of the plaintiff's failure to satisfy the notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5. Robinette v. Johnston, 637 F. Supp. 922 (M.D. Ga. 1986).

Dismissal of premature suit is without prejudice. - In cases in which the merits could not have been reached because of the failure of the plaintiff to satisfy a precondition, such as when a suit is filed prior to the expiration of 30 days from the time of filing the claim, the appropriate action is dismissal of the case on motion. Such a dismissal should be without prejudice, and, having no res judicata effect, would not bar the filing of another suit. Jones v. City of Austell, 166 Ga. App. 808, 305 S.E.2d 653 (1983).

Complaint properly amended after notice of claim given. - Claim by an association of taxicab owners that a city violated procedural due process by failing to provide the association's members with proper notice of violations of regulations was improperly dismissed for failure to comply with the ante-litem notice requirements of O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5 when the association failed to give notice of the claim before filing the association's original complaint, withdrew the claim from the complaint, gave notice under O.C.G.A. § 36-33-5, and then amended the original complaint to add the claim; the notification could not have been accomplished simply by amending the complaint after the action was filed, and to the extent that City of Atlanta v. Fuller, 164 S.E.2d 364 (1968) held otherwise, that case was overruled, but the procedure followed by the association satisfied the procedural requirement of giving the city an opportunity to investigate the claim so as to determine whether to settle the claim without resorting to litigation, and the association was not procedurally barred from pursuing the association's claim for the alleged due process violations that occurred in the six months before the ante-litem notice was given. Atlanta Taxicab Co. Owners Ass'n v. City of Atlanta, 281 Ga. 342, 638 S.E.2d 307 (2006).

Effect of nonsuit on proof of notice. - In an action against a municipality for personal injuries, duly renewed after the grant of a nonsuit in a substantially similar former action in the superior court, the former judgment cannot be taken as having determined that the petition was insufficient, and that the plaintiff had no right to recover, because plaintiff's notice of injury to the municipality was legally insufficient under this section, especially since it is not made to appear that the sufficiency of the notice was in anywise determined or questioned in the former action by demurrer (now motion to dismiss) or otherwise, or that the nonsuit was granted for any reason other than that the evidence as to negligence was insufficient to authorize a recovery. Jones v. Mayor of Savannah, 52 Ga. App. 537, 184 S.E. 353 (1936).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

Am. Jur. 2d. - 56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, § 598 et seq.

C.J.S. - 64A C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 2567, 2568.

ALR. - Applicability of statute or ordinance requiring notice of claim for damages from injuries in street as affected by the conditions which caused the injury, 10 A.L.R. 249.

Necessity of presenting claim against municipality for damaging property, 52 A.L.R. 639.

Right of person not named as claimant in notice of claim to municipality to sustain action thereon, 63 A.L.R. 1080.

Power of municipality to consent to judgment against itself, 67 A.L.R. 1503.

Places within operation of statute or ordinance requiring notice of claim as a condition of municipal liability for injuries, 72 A.L.R. 840.

Waiver of failure to give notice of claim or injury as condition of municipal liability for injury from defect in street or other public place, 82 A.L.R. 749; 159 A.L.R. 329; 65 A.L.R.2d 1278.

What amounts to claim for personal injury within statute or ordinance requiring notice as condition of municipal liability, 97 A.L.R. 118.

Requirement of notice of injury or claim as condition of action against municipality as applicable to injury or death of municipal officer or employee, 98 A.L.R. 522.

Statute of limitations as applicable to actions by or against school districts, 98 A.L.R. 1221.

Construction, application, and effect of statutory provisions avoiding effect of inaccuracy or omission in notice of injury required as condition of municipal liability, 103 A.L.R. 298.

Power of city, town, or county or its officials to compromise claim, 105 A.L.R. 170; 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Continuing character of municipality's negligence and injury or damage therefrom as affecting requirement of notice to municipality, 116 A.L.R. 975.

When statute of limitations commences to run as to action against municipality for damages to riparian premises by pollution of stream by discharge of sewage, 122 A.L.R. 1509.

Necessity and sufficiency of statement as to amount of damages or compensation claimed, in notice or claim required as condition of municipal liability for injury to person or property, 136 A.L.R. 1368.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, defects in notice of claim against county or municipality, 148 A.L.R. 637.

Necessity and sufficiency of statement in notice of tort claim against county or municipality regarding identity of officers or employees chargeable with fault, 150 A.L.R. 1054.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give notice of claim of injury as condition of liability of municipality, county, or other governmental agency for injury from defect in street, road, or other public place, 153 A.L.R. 329; 65 A.L.R.2d 1278.

Use of abbreviations of name of municipal body or private corporation in designating party to judicial proceedings, 167 A.L.R. 1217.

Statute respecting presentation of liability claim against municipality as affecting its powers in that field, 170 A.L.R. 237.

Power of city, town, or county or its officials to compromise claim, 15 A.L.R.2d 1359.

Persons upon whom notice of injury or claim against municipal corporation may or must be served, 23 A.L.R.2d 969.

Infancy or incapacity as affecting notice required as condition of holding municipality or other political subdivision liable for personal injury, 34 A.L.R.2d 725.

Claimant's deposition or statement taken by municipality or other political subdivision as statutory notice of claim for injury or as waiver thereof, 41 A.L.R.2d 883.

Effect of death as a result of injury on requirement of notice of claim against a city or other subordinate governmental unit, 51 A.L.R.2d 1128.

Variance between notice of claim against municipality and proof as regards cause, manner, or locality of the accident, 52 A.L.R.2d 966.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against municipality with respect to nature of defect and cause of accident, 62 A.L.R.2d 397.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against municipality as regards description of personal injury or property damage, 63 A.L.R.2d 863.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against municipality as regards identity, name, and residence of claimant, 63 A.L.R.2d 911.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give required notice of claim of injury to municipality, county, or other governmental agency or body, 65 A.L.R.2d 1278.

Waiver of, or estoppel to rely upon, contractual limitation of time for bringing action against municipality or other political subdivision, 81 A.L.R.2d 1039.

Necessity and sufficiency of plaintiff's pleading of having given requisite notice or presented claim to municipality or other public body, 83 A.L.R.2d 1178.

Claim for contribution or indemnification from another tort-feasor as within provisions of statute or ordinance requiring notice of claim against municipality, 93 A.L.R.2d 1385.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 20 A.L.R.3d 569.

Amount of damages stated in notice of claim against municipality or county as limiting amount of recovery, 24 A.L.R.3d 965.

Incapacity caused by accident in suit as affecting notice of claim required as condition of holding local governmental unit liable for personal injury, 44 A.L.R.3d 1108.

Modern status of the law as to validity of statutes or ordinances requiring notice of tort claim against local governmental entity, 59 A.L.R.3d 93.

Plaintiff's right to bring tort action against municipality prior to expiration of statutory waiting period, 73 A.L.R.3d 1019.

Actual notice or knowledge by governmental body or officer of injury or incident resulting in injury as constituting required claim or notice of claim for injury - modern status, 7 A.L.R.4th 1063.

Local government tort liability: minority as affecting notice of claim requirement, 58 A.L.R.4th 402.

Insufficiency of notice of claim against municipality as regards statement of place where accident occurred, 69 A.L.R.4th 484.

Complaint as satisfying requirement of notice of claim upon states, municipalities, and other political subdivisions, 45 A.L.R.5th 109.

Persons or entities upon whom notice of injury or claim against state or state agencies may or must be served, 45 A.L.R.5th 173.

Sufficiency of notice of claim against local political entity as regards time when accident occurred, 57 A.L.R.5th 689.

Waiver of, or estoppel to assert, failure to give or defects in notice of claim against state or local political subdivision - modern status, 64 A.L.R.5th 519.

36-33-6. Exemption of municipal property from levy and sale.

Statute text

Property of a municipal corporation in use for the public or held for future use for the public is not subject to levy and sale under executions. All property held by a municipal corporation is presumptively for public use.

History

(Civil Code 1895, § 750; Civil Code 1910, § 899; Code 1933, § 69-305.)

Annotations

History of section. - This Code section is derived from the decision in Curry v. Mayor of Savannah, 64 Ga. 290 (1879).

Law reviews. - For article, "Cities and Towns in Georgia: A Distinction with a Difference?," see 14 Mercer L. Rev. 385 (1963).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

All property of every kind held by municipality is presumptively for public use, and while perhaps the presumption may be overcome on proof of a holding for other purposes, as a mere investment to reap profits and save taxes, and with no ulterior purpose to apply the investment to the use or enjoyment of the public thereafter, yet the onus would be upon the plaintiff in execution to make that proof. Curry v. Mayor of Savannah, 64 Ga. 290, 37 Am. R. 74 (1879).

Municipal property held in proprietary capacity subject to sale. - As a general rule, property held by a municipality for governmental or public uses cannot be sold without express legislative authority, but must be devoted to the use and purpose for which the property was intended; the rule is otherwise as to property held by a municipality in the municipality's proprietary or private capacity if not devoted to any specific public use. Kirkland v. Johnson, 209 Ga. 824, 76 S.E.2d 396 (1953).

Land not used for public use subject to sale. - Though land be bought for a public use, if not actually used for such purpose it cannot be said to be held by the municipality as a public trust, and may be sold. Kirkland v. Johnson, 209 Ga. 824, 76 S.E.2d 396 (1953).

When property held by municipality for governmental or public use is abandoned as to such use, the municipality may sell the property without express legislative approval. Kirkland v. Johnson, 209 Ga. 824, 76 S.E.2d 396 (1953).

Town schoolhouse is not subject to levy and sale by virtue of judgment and execution against the town, regardless of whether it is run as a free school, or rented to private teachers, who charge tuition; and consequently, if the house be destroyed by fire, the insurance therefor cannot be reached by garnishment by the judgment creditor. Fleishel & Kimsey v. Hightower, 62 Ga. 324 (1879); Walden v. Town of Whigham, 120 Ga. 646, 48 S.E. 159 (1904).

Cited in Pembroke State Bank v. Balboa Ins. Co., 144 Ga. App. 609, 241 S.E.2d 483 (1978).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Lease to private entity prohibited absent express authority. - Property held by a municipality for the public use and the benefit of the municipality's citizens cannot be leased to a private entity without express legislative authority in the absence of other applicable exceptions. 1992 Op. Att'y Gen. No. U92-9.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

C.J.S. - 63 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 1153, 1154, 1162.

——————————

CHAPTER 34

POWERS OF MUNICIPAL CORPORATIONS GENERALLY

Sec.

36-34-1. Legislative intent.

36-34-2. Powers relating to administration of government generally.

36-34-3. Acquisition and operation of certain buildings and facilities; contracts with other political subdivisions for joint use.

36-34-4. Establishment of facilities and services for treatment of patients.

36-34-5. Acquisition and construction of water and sewage systems.

36-34-5.1. Lease agreements for providing library services.

36-34-5.2. Leases and contracts for operation and maintenance of botanical gardens in municipal corporations having population of more than 300,000.

36-34-5.3. Leases and contracts for operation and maintenance of public zoos in municipal corporations having population of more than 300,000.

36-34-6. Financing of facilities and services.

36-34-7. Powers supplemental.

36-34-8. Provisions of chapter general law; enactment of local or special laws on subject matters covered by chapter; effect of chapter upon amendment of municipal charters.

Annotations

Cross references. - Constitutional provision authorizing General Assembly to provide for self-government of municipalities, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. II, Para. II.

Authority of governing body, planning agency, of municipality to approve plans for clearance, development, of blighted areas, § 8-4-5.

Resolution of conflicts between this chapter and T. 36, C. 35, § 36-35-8.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Editor's notes. - In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, decisions prior to enactment of this chapter are included in the annotations for this chapter.

In light of the similarity of the statutory provisions, opinions decided under former law are included in the opinions for this chapter.

Municipality is a political division of the state, having for the municipality's object the administration of a portion of the power of government delegated to the municipality for that purpose. Cruise v. City of Rome, 94 Ga. App. 373, 94 S.E.2d 617 (1956); Spence v. Rowell, 213 Ga. 145, 97 S.E.2d 350 (1957) (decided under former Code 1933, § 22-103).

Nature of powers possessed by municipal corporation. - Municipal corporation possesses, and can exercise, the following powers, and no others: first, those granted in express words; second, those necessarily or fairly implied; third, those essential to the declared objects and purposes of the corporation - not simply convenient, but indispensable. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Powers granted to municipal corporations are to be strictly construed, and if there is any reasonable doubt of the existence of the power, it will be resolved against the municipality. Kirkland v. Johnson, 209 Ga. 824, 76 S.E.2d 396 (1953) (decided under former Code 1933, § 69-203).

Any fair, reasonable doubt concerning the existence of power is resolved by the courts against the municipal corporation. Jewel Tea Co. v. City Council, 59 Ga. App. 260, 200 S.E. 503 (1938) (decided under former law).

Powers of municipal corporation are fixed by the municipality's charter and by general statutory authority relating to such corporations, and the municipal corporation may exercise such powers as are expressly delegated to the municipality, as well as those which would be reasonably implied from the express terms of the charter. Kirkland v. Johnson, 209 Ga. 824, 76 S.E.2d 396 (1953) (decided under former Code 1933, § 69-203).

Duty to protect citizen. - Municipality, like the state as a whole, owes as the municipality's paramount duty to the citizen the protection of the citizen's person and property. Cruise v. City of Rome, 94 Ga. App. 373, 94 S.E.2d 617 (1956) (decided under former law).

Municipal corporation is without authority, not only to contract or incur liability, but to donate the municipality's money or property, unless authorized by the municipality's charter or some general law of the state. Such a power is not conferred by a general welfare provision in the charter. Miller v. City of Cornelia, 188 Ga. 674, 4 S.E.2d 568 (1939) (decided under former law).

Municipalities have right to control burials in public cemeteries. - Municipalities, under authority to protect the health of a municipality's citizens, have the right to control, by reasonable regulations, the interment and disinterment of bodies in public or municipal cemeteries. Mayor of Savannah v. Colding, 181 Ga. 260, 181 S.E. 821 (1935) (decided under former law).

Cited in City of Athens v. McGahee, 178 Ga. App. 76, 341 S.E.2d 855 (1986).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Municipality cannot, even with approval by referendum election, construct building for rental to private industry as municipalities have no authority to enter into business. 1954-56 Op. Att'y Gen. p. 489 (decided under former law).

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Power of municipality to exact license tax or fee from interurban carrier, 31 A.L.R. 594.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 40 A.L.R. 1370.

Power of municipal corporation or authorities to employ detective, 45 A.L.R. 737.

Delegation by municipality of its powers as to building regulations, 46 A.L.R. 88.

Power of municipality to acquire and operate ice plant, 46 A.L.R. 836; 68 A.L.R. 872.

Power of municipal corporation to fix rates of motor vehicles for hire, 65 A.L.R. 1364.

Power of municipality as to billboards and outdoor advertising, 72 A.L.R. 465.

Power of municipal corporation to employ attorney, 83 A.L.R. 135.

Power of municipality to classify for purposes of taxation as affected by classification made by state or its failure to classify, 110 A.L.R. 1203.

Power of municipality to impose chain store license tax, 111 A.L.R. 596.

Delegation to board or officer of police power to require vacation, destruction, or repair of individual building deemed by such officer or board unsafe or insanitary, apart from noncompliance with specific regulations, 114 A.L.R. 446.

Right of municipality to invoke constitutional provisions against acts of state legislature, 116 A.L.R. 1037.

Power of municipalities or other political subdivisions to engage in a joint project or enterprise, 123 A.L.R. 997.

Municipal ordinance relating to persons engaged in specified occupations or professions as applicable to officials or employees of state or political subdivision other than the municipality, 123 A.L.R. 1383.

Municipal license as affecting municipality's exercise of police power adversely to licensee, 124 A.L.R. 523.

Power of municipal corporation to contribute financially to municipal league or other organizations of a similar character, 169 A.L.R. 1230.

Power of municipality to sell, lease, or mortgage public utility plant or interest therein, 61 A.L.R.2d 595.

Power of municipal corporation to submit to arbitration, 20 A.L.R.3d 569.

Power of municipal corporation to lease or sublet property owned or leased by it, 47 A.L.R.3d 19.

Power of municipality to charge nonresidents higher fees than residents for use of municipal facilities, 57 A.L.R.3d 998.

36-34-1. Legislative intent.

Statute text

It is declared to be the intention of the General Assembly to vest certain general powers in the governing body of each of the municipal corporations of this state, such powers to be in addition to or cumulative of those which any municipal corporation may now have under its charter or any other special or general law. It is the purpose of this grant of general powers:

(1) To provide authority for all municipal corporations to exercise certain common functions of local government;

(2) To provide for local self-government to the extent of the powers granted; and

(3) To relieve the necessity for special legislative action by the General Assembly to the extent of the powers granted in this chapter.

History

(Ga. L. 1962, p. 140, § 1.)

Annotations
